test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_lnr_panna_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - panna - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     panna+V+Inf: panna
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: panen
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: panet
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pannee
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: panema
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: panetta
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: panhaan
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: panin
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: panit
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pani
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: panima
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: panitta
     panna+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: panthiin
     panna+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pannu
     panna+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pantu
     panna+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: panheet
     panna+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: panneeva
     panna+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: panneevat
     panna+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pantava
     panna+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pantavat

     panna+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: panisin
     panna+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: panisit
     panna+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: panis
     panna+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: panisimma
     panna+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: panisitta
     panna+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: pantais
     panna+V+Pass+Cond: pantais

     panna+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: pane
     panna+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: pankkaa
     
     panna+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: panemassa
     panna+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: panemasta
     panna+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: panemhaan
     panna+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: panemalla
     panna+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: panematta
